Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.12
Law enforcement officer; psychological evaluation; when required.

(1) Prior to hiring a person as a law enforcement officer, a law enforcement agency shall, if such person has not previously worked as a law enforcement officer in Nebraska, cause such person to undergo a psychological evaluation to determine fitness for duty. The cost of such evaluation shall be the responsibility of the agency.

(2) The council may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2021, LB51, § 10.